Utah statutes.
78B-1-144.   Witnesses -- Affirmation or declaration instead of oath allowed.

Any person may, instead of taking an oath, opt to make a solemn affirmation or declaration, by assenting, when addressed in the following form:

"You do solemnly affirm (or declare) that... ." etc., as in Section 78B-1-143.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

